California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The legislative body may not confirm the assessment unless the owners of a majority in area of the lands in the district subject to assessment have filed with the clerk of the legislative body written consent to the levy of an assessment under this chapter. An owner of land means one who appears as the owner in fee on the records of the county recorder on the date the consent is filed and includes an executor, administrator, guardian, or trustee as to property of an estate or trust represented by him. An owner may file his written consent at any time either prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention or prior to the hearing or during the hearing and prior to the conclusion thereof. Prior to the conclusion of the hearing the legislative body shall determine whether or not a majority consent has been filed and such determination shall be conclusive.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35470.

After the assessment roll is recorded, all persons are deemed to have notice of its contents.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35471.

Immediately upon the recording, the several assessments contained in the assessment roll are due and payable, and each assessment is a lien upon the property against which it is made. Unless sooner discharged, the lien shall continue for four years from the date of recording, or if bonds are issued to represent the assessment, the lien shall continue until the expiration of four years after the due date of the last installment upon the bonds or the last principal coupon attached to them.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35472.

The lien, whether bonds issued to represent the assessment or otherwise, shall be subordinate to all fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon the same property, but it shall have priority over all fixed special assessment liens which may thereafter be created against the property. The lien of a reassessment and of a refunding assessment shall be the same as the original assessment to which it relates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35473.

Any deed issued in the foreclosure of the assessment lien or sale of property for the lien conveys the property to the purchaser free and clear of all encumbrances, except taxes, and such special assessment liens as are, at the date of creation of the lien, equal or superior to the assessment lien.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35474.

Any action or proceeding to set aside, cancel, avoid, annul, or correct any assessment or reassessment, or to review any of the proceedings, acts, or determinations pursuant to this chapter, or to question the validity or enjoin the collection of any assessment or reassessment, or to enjoin the issuance of bonds to represent any assessment or reassessment, shall not be maintained by any person, unless such action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the recording of the diagram and assessment or reassessment. Thereafter all persons are barred from any such action or proceeding or any defense of invalidity of the assessment or reassessment, or of bonds issued on the assessment or reassessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35475.

Proceedings under this chapter shall not be attacked upon any ground not stated in an objection or protest filed pursuant to this chapter. Any landowner or person interested in any land within the district is estopped to attack the proceedings upon any ground not stated in an objection or protest filed by him pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35476.

The officer with whom the assessment is recorded shall give notice that the assessment has been recorded in his office and that all sums assessed in it become due and payable upon the recordation of the assessment, stating the date of recordation and that the payment of the sums, in whole or in part, is to be made to him within 30 days after the date of recordation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35477.

The notice shall also contain a statement that bonds to represent each assessment, or the unpaid balance thereof, remaining unpaid after 30 days will issue in the manner and form provided in this chapter, and shall state the period over which the bonds extend and the maximum rate of interest payable on them.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35478.

The notice shall be published twice in a daily or weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the city in which the assessed land lies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35479.

Notice shall also be given by mailing a post card to the owner of each lot, piece, or parcel of land assessed, according to the name and address appearing on the last equalized assessment roll prior to the recordation of the assessment or as known to the officer giving the notice.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35480.

Failure of the officer with whom the assessment is recorded to give notice by mailing, or of the person addressed to receive the notice, shall not affect the validity of the proceedings or the validity of the lien of any assessment or of any bond issued on the assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35481.

When any payment is made upon an assessment, the street superintendent shall mark opposite the assessment “Paid in full” or “Paid in part,” as the case may be, the date of payment, the amount of payment, and the name of the person by or for whom the assessment is paid. If so requested, he shall give receipt for the payment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35482.

After the expiration of 30 days from the date of recording the assessment, the superintendent of streets shall make a complete list of all assessments unpaid and the amounts unpaid, except assessments upon public property.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35483.

All unpaid assessments upon public property shall be collected pursuant to this article, but if the property is not in use in the performance of a public function, the lien of the assessment may be foreclosed in the mode provided for foreclosure of assessments in Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 5410) of Part 3 of Division 7 (the Improvement Act of 1911).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bonds for Assessments [35500. - 35512.]

35500.

Bonds shall be issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35501.

The list of unpaid assessments shall be certified and filed with the city treasurer. Upon the filing of the list, the city treasurer shall make out and sign a separate bond representing upon each lot or parcel of land on the list the total amount of the unpaid assessment against it as shown on the list.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35502.

The legislative body shall sell the bonds for cash for not less than the amount of the assessments represented by the bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35503.

At any time after the assessment is recorded, the legislative body may call for sealed bids on the bonds proposed to be issued. Notice inviting bids shall be given by two publications in a newspaper published in the city, the first publication to be at least 10 days before the bids are to be opened.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35504.

The legislative body shall sell the bonds for cash, and if bids are made, for cash to the best responsible bidder.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35505.

The bonds may be sold at any rate of interest not exceeding that stated in the resolution of intention. The maximum interest rate shall not exceed 7 percent a year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35506.

The bonds shall extend over a period not to exceed 24 years from January 2nd next succeeding the next September 1st following their date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35507.

Upon the award of the bonds to a purchaser, the treasurer shall issue bonds representing the liens of the unpaid assessments as shown on the list and bearing interest at the rate fixed by the legislative body.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35508.

The treasurer shall deliver the bonds to the purchaser upon receiving the purchase price bid. The purchase price shall be deposited in the fund for the redemption of the bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35400) of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35509.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, bonds to be issued pursuant to this article shall be issued pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 7 (the Improvement Act of 1911). Except as modified by this article, the provisions of that part are adopted for the issuance, collection, and enforcement of bonds issued pursuant to this article, and the provisions of that part apply to bonds issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35510.

The date of the bonds shall be the date selected and specified for that purpose by the legislative body in the resolution or order calling for sealed bids upon the bonds. The date shall be a date between the date of recordation of the assessment and the date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser thereof. The bonds shall bear interest from their date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35511.

Where an action or proceeding is brought to set aside, cancel, avoid, annul, or correct any assessment or reassessment, or to review any of the proceedings, acts or determinations pursuant to this chapter, or to question the validity or enjoin the collection of any assessment or reassessment or to enjoin the issuance of bonds to represent any assessment or reassessment, said action or proceeding being brought after recordation of the assessment or reassessment but before the sale and award of the bonds, the legislative body may issue and sell the bonds unless prevented by order of court and may, in its discretion, order: (1) that the bonds be dated and
 bear interest as provided in Section 35510, or (2) that the bonds be dated and bear interest from such date as may be specified by the legislative body, or (3) that notice of the assessment or reassessment be refiled in the office of the county recorder, in which case the time of recording as used in this part and in Section 4289 shall be the time of refiling such notice instead of the time of filing the original notice with the county recorder.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35512.

The bonds shall be substantially in the following form: Parking District No. (Number of district)
 of the City of _______________

 Improvement Bond$No. Under and by virtue of the Parking District Law of 1951, I, out of the fund for the above designated Parking District No.____ of the City of ____ bonds, will pay to ____, or order, (or to bearer,) the sum of $____, with interest at the rate of ___ percent per annum, all as is hereinafter specified, and at the office of the Treasurer of the City of ____, State of California.

This bond is issued to provide funds necessary for the redemption of bonds for certain parking places in the City of ____ as the same are more fully described in assessment number ____ issued by the street superintendent of said city and recorded in his office. Its amount is the amount assessed in said assessment against the lot or parcel of land numbered therein, and in the diagram attached thereto,
 as number ____, and which now remains unpaid, and constitutes a lien upon the property affected thereby, as the same is described herein, and in said recorded assessment with its diagram, to wit: The lot or parcel of land in said City of ____, County of ____, State of California, described as follows: ______

This bond is payable exclusively from said fund, and neither the city nor any officer thereof is to be holden for payment otherwise of its principal or interest. The term of this bond is ____ years from the second day of January next succeeding the next ____ following its date, and at the expiration of said time the whole sum then unpaid shall be due and payable; but on the second day of January of each year, following the next ____ after its date, an even annual proportion of its whole amount is due and payable, upon presentation of the coupon therefor, until the whole is paid, with all accrued interest at the rate of ____ per centum per annum.

The interest is payable semiannually, to wit: On the second days of January and of July in each year hereafter, upon presentation of the coupons therefor, hereto attached, the first of which is for the interest from date to the next second day of ____ and thereafter the interest coupons are for semiannual interest.

This bond may be redeemed by the owner or any person interested in any lot or parcel of land described herein, in the manner provided in said law, at any time before maturity, and before commencement of proceedings for sale, upon payment to the treasurer, for the holder of this bond, of the amount then unpaid on the principal thereof, with interest thereon calculated up to the due date of the next maturing interest coupon, and all penalties accrued and unpaid together with a premium of 3 percent of the unpaid principal.

Should default be made in the annual payment upon the
 principal, or in any payment of interest from the owner of said lot or parcel of land, or anyone in his behalf, the holder of this bond is entitled on or after the second day of January or July, as the case may be, following such default to declare the whole unpaid amount to be due and payable, and to have said lot or parcel of land advertised and sold forthwith, in the manner provided by law; provided, however, that any bond may be reinstated after such default in the manner provided in said law. In case of such default there shall be immediately added to such defaulted amount 1 percent of the amount thereof, and on the first day of each month following such default there shall be added a further penalty of 1 percent of such defaulted amount. The 1 percent penalty first imposed and all subsequent penalties shall be paid to the holder of the bond along with and as a part of such defaulted payment.

At said City of ____, this ___ day of ____, in the year one
 thousand, nine hundred and ____.Treasurer of the City of

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disposition of Funds [35520. - 35522.]

35520.

From time to time the street superintendent shall pay to the treasurer all money collected by him on account of any assessment levied pursuant to this chapter.

On receipt of the money the treasurer shall place it in the fund for the redemption of the bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35400) of this part. All proceeds of any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall also be placed in such fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35521.

Moneys in the fund clearly in excess of the amount necessary to redeem the outstanding bonds as hereinafter provided may be used to pay the costs and expenses referred to in Section 35464. The balance of the fund shall be a trust fund pledged to and held for the benefit of the holders of the outstanding bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35400) of this part, and until the bonds and the interest thereon have been fully paid the balance shall be used for no purpose other than the payment of the principal thereof, the interest thereon, and any premiums payable upon the call thereof. If the bonds, or any portion thereof, are to be called for redemption, the city shall immediately give notice of such redemption in the manner and form provided in the ordinance, resolution or indenture under which the bonds were issued, even though the notice may be premature as to time, but if the notice is premature the city shall later give the notice again within the proper time. As soon as the notice, even though premature, has been given and as soon as there are moneys in the fund clearly sufficient to pay the principal of all of the bonds, all interest to maturity or to the call date stated in the notice as the case may be, and all premiums to which bondholders will be entitled by reason of the call, the city is discharged from all obligations under this part or under the ordinance, resolution or indenture to make charges for the use of, or produce revenues from, parking places of the district or parking meters on streets, but the city shall continue to be bound by all other provisions of the ordinance, resolution or indenture.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35522.

When a fund has been established under this chapter sufficient to redeem all outstanding bonds previously issued on behalf of the district pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35400) of this part, Section 35111 shall no longer apply to the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reassessment [35530. - 35549.1.]

35530.

A reassessment shall be issued in any of the following events:

(a) When an assessment made, issued, or filed in the office of the clerk, or any bonds issued to represent the amounts of any such assessment, have been set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction, or when the court has refused to enforce an assessment or has decreed any such bonds not to constitute or represent valid and subsisting liens against the lots or parcels of land upon which the assessments represented by them have been levied.

(b) If for any reason the assessments or bonds, or both, are not effective and the curative and waiver provisions of this chapter or any curative act passed by the Legislature in relation to them fail to make them valid and enforceable. 

(c) Upon the initiative of the legislative body if the legislative body is of the opinion that all or any part of the assessments or bonds are not enforceable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35531.

It is the intent of this article to make the cost of the redemption of bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35400) of this part through an attempted compliance with this chapter payable by the real property benefited by the parking place for which such bonds were issued by making a reassessment for that purpose. The power of reassessment embraces both a full and partial reassessment, and is not exhausted by a single attempted exercise of the power.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35532.

Whenever the owner or holder of any bonds issued to represent or to be secured by assessments requests the legislative body to order a reassessment and the legislative body is of the opinion that such bonds are not enforceable, it shall order the making and issuing of a reassessment covering only the assessments represented by, or securing the bonds owned or held by, the petitioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35533.

If, in any suit involving the validity of the obligation of any bond or assessment, a court of competent jurisdiction for any reason holds the lien of the assessment or bond to be unenforceable, the court in and by its decree shall direct the making of a reassessment to cover the assessments involved in the suit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35534.

If, in any suit to set aside the lien of any assessment or of any bond representing any assessment, or in any suit to quiet title against the lien of any such assessment or bond, or in any suit to enjoin the making, filing, confirmation, or issuance of any assessment or bond to pay for the cost and expenses of any acquisition and improvement pursuant to this part, a court of competent jurisdiction in its judgment decrees such assessments or bonds to be void or unenforceable or enjoins the making, filing, issuance, or confirmation of any such assessment or bond, the court in and by its decree shall direct the making of a reassessment to cover the assessments involved in the suit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35535.

If, in any suit contesting the validity and legal force and effect of a sale to foreclose the lien of any assessment or bond, a court of competent jurisdiction decrees the sale to be void or unenforceable for any reason, the court in and by its decree shall direct the making of a reassessment to cover the assessments involved in the suit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35536.

If a reassessment is directed, by a decree of court or by an order of the legislative body, the street superintendent shall proceed to make a reassessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35537.

If the reassessment is a partial one only, it is not necessary for the diagram to show any lots other than those covered by the partial reassessment. If it is a full reassessment, the street superintendent shall prepare and file with the reassessment a diagram showing the lots or parcels of land deemed by him to be benefited by the parking place for which the bonds were issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35538.

The reassessment shall assess upon and against each of the lots or parcels of land contained in it an amount determined as follows:

(a) The benefits derived by each of the lots or parcels of land from the parking place for which the bonds were issued estimated as of the date of the filing in the clerk’s office of the original assessment shall first be listed.

(b) Interest shall be added to amounts determined pursuant to (a) from the date of recording of the original assessment at the rate of 7 percent a year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35539.

The total of the reassessment, exclusive of interest, shall not exceed the total amount necessary for the redemption of the bonds which are outstanding.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35540.

The reassessment need not be in any prescribed form. It shall:

(a) Refer to the original assessment and set forth the date it was filed.

(b) State that it is made pursuant to the order of the legislative body or decree of court, as the case may be.

(c) Be accompanied by a diagram showing the lots or parcels of land to be reassessed and their relation to the parking place for which the bonds were issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35541.

The reassessment shall be presented to the legislative body, which shall fix a time for hearing. The hearing shall be at least 20 days after the presentation of the reassessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35542.

The clerk shall advertise the time of hearing by publishing a notice in the newspaper in the city in which the parking place for which the bonds were issued is located. The notice shall be published for five insertions, if the newspaper is a daily, or for two insertions if the newspaper is published less frequently. If the reassessment is to be against the property in a district, this fact shall be set forth and the reassessment diagram referred to for particulars.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35543.

At the time fixed for the hearing, or at any time to which the hearing is adjourned, the legislative body shall consider the objections to the reassessment and may informally direct the revision, correction, and modification of the reassessment in such manner as is most equitable to apportion to each lot or parcel of land benefited the amount of the actual benefits derived from the parking place.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35544.

When the reassessment is revised, corrected, or modified to comply with its judgment the legislative body shall pass a resolution confirming the reassessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35545.

The clerk shall certify at the end of the reassessment, that it is the reassessment approved by the legislative body.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35546.

The street superintendent shall record the reassessment with the clerk’s certificate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35547.

The street superintendent shall note opposite the several assessments in the original assessment that have been displaced by the reassessment the fact that the reassessment has been made, giving its date, and shall credit upon the reassessment all payments made upon the original assessment, or upon the bonds issued to represent the original assessment, and interest on the payments at the rate of 7 percent a year from the date of the payments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35548.

The reassessment shall be collected, paid, and enforced in the same manner as an original assessment, and shall have the same weight in evidence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35549.

If bonds were issued under or upon the security of the original assessment, they shall issue upon the reassessment for the sum reassessed against the lots or parcel of land covered by it.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

35549.1.

When the reassessment is recorded, the original assessment shall be canceled by the street superintendent so far as it affects the particular assessments involved. New bonds shall not be issued until the original bonds are delivered up to the treasurer who shall cancel them. The lien of the reassessment shall hold its relative rank as to other special assessment liens as of the date of filing of the original assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 234.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Parking Place Commission [35550. - 35573.]

35550.

Immediately upon the acquisition of the parking places, a parking place commission shall be appointed. In the discretion of the legislative body, the commission may be appointed at any time prior to such acquisition and after the adoption of the ordinance declaring the district formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35550.1.

At its discretion, the legislative body of any city may, by ordinance, provide for the appointment, removal, qualifications, terms of office and numbers of members of parking place commissioners for such city. Such board shall have all of the powers and duties of parking place commissioners appointed under this part. Such board, so appointed, may be an existing board created by city charter or ordinance or a new board created by ordinance. Such board may act for all vehicle parking districts established within said city under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1925.)
-------------------------------------------

35551.

The commission shall consist of three members, each of whom shall be a resident and qualified elector of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35552.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, unless the legislative body determines that compensation shall be paid and fixes the compensation to be paid from funds of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35553.

Members of the commission shall be appointed by the chief executive officer of the city, subject to confirmation by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35554.

The commissioners shall hold office for the term of three years from the date of their appointment and qualification and until their successors are appointed and qualify, except that members of the first commission appointed shall classify themselves by lot so that one member holds office for one year, one for two years, and one for three years, and, in each instance, until a successor has been appointed and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35554.5.

A commissioner appointed to fill a vacancy created by the death, resignation, incapacity or removal of a commissioner shall hold office for the unexpired term of the former incumbent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35555.

A commissioner may be removed by a four-fifths vote of the legislative body at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35556.

Commissioners shall be persons of business experience and ability, to the end that the affairs of the district shall be administered in the interests of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35557.

Whenever a petition signed by the owners of real property in the district of an assessed value of more than fifty percent (50%) of the total assessed value of the taxable real property in the district, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll, requesting the removal of a commissioner is filed with the legislative body it shall immediately remove him and appoint a new commissioner. The commissioner removed is ineligible to hold office as a commissioner of the district for one year following his removal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35558.

The parking places acquired are under the jurisdiction and control of the commission of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35559.

The commission shall operate, manage, and control the parking places and make and enforce all necessary rules for their use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35560.

The commission may fix, regulate, and collect rentals, fees, or other charges for the use of parking places under its control, and may provide different rates for different classes of customers, or users, provided that such rentals, fees or other charges shall be sufficient to produce funds to comply with the terms of the ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of bonds. Such rentals, fees, or other charges shall be fixed after public hearing following such notice as the commission may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35561.

The providing of adequate public parking places in cities largely depends upon the formation of parking districts. Such districts will be created and will be successful only if so operated as to serve adequately the property within the district. It is the intent of this part, if the ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds provides for the levy of an ad valorem assessment upon the taxable real property in the district, that the owners of real property in a parking district created pursuant to this part to provide parking places to solve the parking problems of the district may receive preferential rates, charges, or rentals for themselves, their tenants, and the classes of persons who call upon or do business with them, all to the end that the property which bears the burden and provides a solution for the parking problem shall receive a special benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35562.

All parking places acquired and constructed pursuant to this part are public parking places, but, if the ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds provides for the levy of an ad valorem assessment upon the taxable real property in the district, the commission may restrict or partially restrict their use to owners and tenants of real property in the district, and classes of persons designated by such owners or their tenants and may establish rates, charges, or rentals for the owners and tenants of such properties and classes of persons designated by the owners or tenants which differ from and are less than the rates, charges, or rentals charged other persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35564.

All employees required for the proper operation, management, and control of the parking places acquired and constructed under this part shall be city employees selected as other city employees are selected. The number of such employees and their salaries shall be determined by the legislative body unless, by ordinance, which may be adopted or repealed at any time, the power to make such determination is granted to the board. Any salary or wage so fixed shall in each instance be at least equal to the prevailing salary or wage for the same quality of services rendered to private persons, firms or corporations in the city under similar employment, in case such prevailing salary or wage can be ascertained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 433.)
-------------------------------------------

35565.

The commission shall fix such rentals, fees, or charges for the use of parking places under its control as will produce revenue, when added to the expected revenues from on-street parking meters pledged to any of the purposes specified in this part, sufficient to pay the principal and interest on the bonds as they fall due, and also to provide any additional sums which may be required under the provisions of the ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35566.

If the petition for the formation of a district and the resolution of intention to form the district state that this section and Section 35414.1 shall apply to proceedings taken pursuant thereto, Section 35565 shall not apply and the provisions of this section shall apply. The commission shall fix such rentals, fees or other charges for the use of parking places under its control as will produce revenue, when added to the expected revenues from on-street parking meters, assessments or other sources pledged to any of the purposes specified in this part, sufficient to pay the principal and interest on the bonds as they fall due, and also to provide any additional sums which may be required under the provisions of the ordinance, resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

35567.

The commission shall abide by all covenants made by the legislative body in the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35568.

In the exercise of its power to operate, manage, and control parking places, the commission may lease any or all parking places to any person for the sole purpose of the operation of public parking facilities on them by such person, or may make a contract with any person for such purpose. The consideration to be paid by the operator for any lease or under any contract may be a fixed sum or a percentage of gross rentals, fees, or charges collected by the operator, or any other consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35569.

The maximum rentals, fees, and charges to be collected by the operator shall be fixed by the commission after public hearing following such notice as the commission prescribes, and shall be recited in the lease or contract. No higher rentals, fees, or charges shall be collected by the operator without amendment of the lease or contract agreed to by the commission after like public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35570.

The commission or any operator shall not conduct any business other than that of the operation of public parking facilities on any parking place of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

35571.

If the ordinance, resolution, or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds provides for the levy of an ad valorem assessment upon the taxable real property in the district, any lease or contract may provide that the use of the parking places shall be restricted, or partially restricted, to owners and tenants of real property in the district, and classes of persons designated by them, and may provide for maximum rates, charges, or rentals for such persons which differ from and are less than the maximum rates, charges, or rentals charged other persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 256.)
-------------------------------------------

35572.
